Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1037.
do enact as follows:AB1037,11Section 1. 16.855 (19) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1037,2,18216.855 (19) (a) As the work progresses under any contract for construction of 3a project the department, from time to time, shall grant to the contractor an 4estimate of the amount and proportionate value of the work properly completed, 5which shall entitle the contractor to receive the amount, less the retainage, from the 6proper fund. The retainage shall be an amount equal to not more than 5 3 percent 7of the estimate until 50 percent of the work has been completed. At 50 percent 8completion, no additional amounts shall be retained, and partial payments shall be 9made in full to the contractor unless the department certifies that the job is not 10proceeding satisfactorily. At 50 percent completion or any time thereafter when the 11progress of the work is not satisfactory, additional amounts may be retained but in 12no event shall the total retainage be more than 10 percent of the value of the work 13completed. Upon substantial completion of the work, any amount retained shall be 14paid to the contractor, less the value of any required corrective work or uncompleted 15work. For the purposes of this section, estimates may include any fabricated or 16manufactured materials and components specified, previously paid for by 17contractor and delivered to the work or properly stored and suitable for 18incorporation in the work embraced in the contract.AB1037,219Section 2. 16.855 (19) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1037,3,162016.855 (19) (b) As the work progresses under any subcontract under sub. (14) 1(e) for construction of a project, the general prime contractor shall, upon request of 2a subcontractor, pay to the subcontractor an amount equal to the proportionate 3value of the subcontractor’s work properly completed, less retainage. The retainage 4shall be an amount equal to not more than 5 3 percent of the subcontractor’s work 5completed until 50 percent of the subcontractor’s work has been completed. At 50 6percent completion, no additional amounts may be retained, and partial payments 7shall be made in full to the subcontractor unless the department or the Board of 8Regents certifies that the subcontractor’s work is not proceeding satisfactorily. At 950 percent completion or any time thereafter when the progress of the 10subcontractor’s work is not satisfactory, additional amounts may be retained but 11the total retainage may not be more than 10 percent of the value of the work 12completed. Upon substantial completion of the subcontractor’s work, any amount 13retained shall be paid to the subcontractor, less the value of any required corrective 14work or uncompleted work. All payments the general prime contractor makes 15under this paragraph shall be within 7 calendar days after the date on which the 16general prime contractor receives payment from the department or board.AB1037,317Section 3. 66.0901 (1) (ap) of the statutes is created to read:AB1037,3,201866.0901 (1) (ap) “Mechanical, electrical, or plumbing subcontractor” means a 19subcontractor that performs mechanical, electrical, plumbing, or fire protection 20work pursuant to a contract with a prime contractor.AB1037,421Section 4. 66.0901 (9) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1037,4,242266.0901 (9) (b) As the work progresses under a contract involving $1,000 or 23more for the construction, execution, repair, remodeling or improvement of a public 24work or building or for the furnishing of supplies or materials, regardless of 1whether proposals for the contract are required to be advertised by law, the 2municipality, from time to time, shall grant to the contractor an estimate of the 3amount and proportionate value of the work done, which entitles the contractor to 4receive the amount of the estimate, less the retainage, from the proper fund. The 5retainage shall be an amount equal to not more than 5 3 percent of the estimate 6until 50 percent of the work has been completed. At 50 percent completion, further 7partial payments shall be made in full to the contractor and no additional amounts 8may be retained unless the architect or engineer certifies that the job is not 9proceeding satisfactorily, but amounts previously retained shall not be paid to the 10contractor. At 50 percent completion or any time after 50 percent completion when 11the progress of the work is not satisfactory, additional amounts may be retained but 12the total retainage may not be more than 10 percent of the value of the work 13completed. Upon substantial completion of the work, an amount retained may be 14paid to the contractor. When the work has been substantially completed except for 15work which cannot be completed because of weather conditions, lack of materials or 16other reasons which in the judgment of the municipality are valid reasons for 17noncompletion, the municipality may make additional payments, retaining at all 18times an amount sufficient to cover the estimated cost of the work still to be 19completed or may pay out the entire amount retained and receive from the 20contractor guarantees in the form of a bond or other collateral sufficient to ensure 21completion of the job. For the purposes of this section, estimates may include any 22fabricated or manufactured materials and components specified, previously paid for 23by the contractor and delivered to the work or properly stored and suitable for 24incorporation in the work embraced in the contract.AB1037,51Section 5. 66.0901 (9) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB1037,5,19266.0901 (9) (c) As the work progresses under any subcontract between a 3mechanical, electrical, or plumbing subcontractor and a prime contractor for the 4construction, execution, repair, remodeling, or improvement of a public work, the 5prime contractor shall, upon request of the subcontractor, pay to the subcontractor 6an amount equal to the proportionate value of the subcontractor’s work properly 7completed, less retainage. The retainage shall be an amount equal to not more than 83 percent of the subcontractor’s work completed until 50 percent of the 9subcontractor’s work has been completed. At 50 percent completion, no additional 10amounts may be retained, and partial payments shall be made in full to the 11subcontractor unless the municipality certifies that the subcontractor's work is not 12satisfactory. At 50 percent completion or any time after 50 percent completion when 13progress of the work is not satisfactory, additional amounts may be retained but the 14total retainage may not be more than 10 percent of the value of the work completed. 15Upon substantial completion of the subcontractor’s work, any amount retained 16shall be paid to the subcontractor, less the value of any required corrective work or 17uncompleted work. All payments the prime contractor makes under this paragraph 18shall be made within 7 calendar days after the date on which the prime contractor 19receives payment from the municipality.AB1037,5,2020